apertium-ur-hi.hi.dix
    <pardef n="जु/आ__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>आ</l>
          <r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/ई__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ई</l>
          <r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ई</l>
          <r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इयाँ</l>
          <r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इयों</l>
          <r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="बिटि/आ__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>आ</l>
          <r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>आ</l>
          <r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>आँ</l>
          <r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओं</l>
          <r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="क/ई__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ई</l>
          <r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ई</l>
          <r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ई</l>
          <r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इयों</l>
          <r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इयों</l>
          <r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="अडबंग__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ों</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="खुशब/ू__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ू</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ू</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुएँ</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुयें</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ू</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुओं</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ू</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="कला/ई__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ई</l>
          <r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ई</l>
          <r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ई</l>
          <r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इयाँ</l>
          <r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ई</l>
          <r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इयों</l>
          <r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- Adjectives -->

    <pardef n="गर्म__adj">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
       </pardef>

    <pardef n="अच्छी__adj">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
       </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="पुराने__adj">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
       </pardef>

    <pardef n="बालक__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="जड__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ऐसी/आ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>आ</l>
          <r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ई</l>
          <r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ई</l>
          <r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ई</l>
          <r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ई</l>
          <r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="अँबराई"><i>अँबरा</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="अडबंग"><i>अडबंग</i><par n="अडबंग__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="गुरुभाई"><i>गुरुभा</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="रजाई"><i>रजा</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="दाई"><i>दा</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="बलवाई"><i>बलवा</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="कलाई"><i>कला</i><par n="कला/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="लुनाई"><i>लुना</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="हलवाई"><i>हलवा</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="तमाशाई"><i>तमाशा</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="अधपई"><i>अधप</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="दूधभाई"><i>दूधभा</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="महासभाई"><i>महासभा</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="बेवफाई"><i>बेवफा</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="सूई"><i>सू</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="परछाई"><i>परछा</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="दंगाई"><i>दंगा</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="लंबाई"><i>लंबा</i><par n="कला/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="सेँवई"><i>सेँव</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="बहनोई"><i>बहनो</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ईसाई"><i>ईसा</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="भाई"><i>भा</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="लडाई"><i>लडा</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="सलाई"><i>सला</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="नंदोई"><i>नंदो</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="बिटिआ"><i>बिटि</i><par n="बिटि/आ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="रोशनाई"><i>रोशना</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ननदोई"><i>ननदो</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="चारपाई"><i>चारपा</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="खुशबू"><i>खुशब</i><par n="खुशब/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="दीयासलाई"><i>दीयासला</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="कई"><i>क</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="डाई"><i>डा</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="कसाई"><i>कसा</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="जुआ"><i>जु</i><par n="जु/आ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="इकाई"><i>इका</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="परिहासमय"><i>परिहासमय</i><par n="गर्म__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नज़दीक"><i>नज़दीक</i><par n="गर्म__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="तरह"><i>तरह</i><par n="गर्म__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ख़ुश"><i>ख़ुश</i><par n="गर्म__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="छोटी"><i>छोटी</i><par n="अच्छी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अच्छी"><i>अच्छी</i><par n="अच्छी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="छोटा"><i>छोटा</i><par n="गर्म__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="महान"><i>महान</i><par n="गर्म__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अनाश्रय"><i>अनाश्रय</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अभागीआ"><i>अभागी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="वाक्प्रसारीआ"><i>वाक्प्रसारी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="संस्तुत"><i>संस्तुत</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अनुनयीआ"><i>अनुनयी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="घोलक"><i>घोलक</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ताजीआ"><i>ताजी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="उपहित"><i>उपहित</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बडभागीआ"><i>बडभागी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="विगृहीत"><i>विगृहीत</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सूखीआ"><i>सूखी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अफल"><i>अफल</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अनुसारीआ"><i>अनुसारी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सा"><i>सा</i><par n="गर्म__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अच्छा"><i>अच्छा</i><par n="गर्म__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बडीआ"><i>बडी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अस्निग्ध"><i>अस्निग्ध</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="जैसीआ"><i>जैसी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="समाजबहिष्कृत"><i>समाजबहिष्कृत</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बूडीआ"><i>बूडी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बलादवतरित"><i>बलादवतरित</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बौनीआ"><i>बौनी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रतिमुद्रांकित"><i>प्रतिमुद्रांकित</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="उठल्लूआ"><i>उठल्लू</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="जडाऊ"><i>जडाऊ</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="आजादखयाल"><i>आजादखयाल</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सूनीआ"><i>सूनी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="असंयुक्त"><i>असंयुक्त</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बालक"><i>बालक</i><par n="बालक__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="हर"><i>हर</i><par n="गर्म__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="गर्म"><i>गर्म</i><par n="गर्म__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कुछ"><i>कुछ</i><par n="गर्म__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="असंसारीआ"><i>असंसारी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बाँझ"><i>बाँझ</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पुराने"><i>पुराने</i><par n="पुराने__adj"/></e>
